Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 5. Rights-Of-Way: Transmission Companies

38-5-101.
Use of public highways.

Any domestic or foreign electric light power, gas, or pipeline company authorized to do business under the laws of this state or any city or town owning electric power producing or distribution facilities shall have the right to construct, maintain, and operate lines of electric light, wire or power or pipeline along, across, upon, and under any public highway in this state, subject to the provisions of this article. Such lines of electric light, wire or power, or pipeline shall be so constructed and maintained as not to obstruct or hinder the usual travel on such highway.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 385, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2451.

C.L.

§ 6352.

CSA:

C. 61, § 42.

L. 39:

P. 365, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-1.

L. 63:

P. 479, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 2, effective April 12.

38-5-102.
Right-of-way across state land.

Any domestic or foreign electric light power, gas, or pipeline company authorized to do business under the laws of this state, or any city or town owning electric power producing or distribution facilities shall have the right to construct, maintain, and operate lines of electric light wire or power or pipeline and obtain permanent right-of-way therefor over, upon, under, and across all public lands owned by or under the control of the state, upon the payment of such compensation and upon compliance with such reasonable conditions as may be required by the state board of land commissioners.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 385, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2452.

C.L.

§ 6353.

CSA:

C. 61, § 43.

L. 39:

P. 365, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-2.

L. 63:

P. 479, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-2.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 3, effective April 12.

38-5-103.
Power of companies to contract.

Such electric light power, gas, or pipeline company, or such city, town, or other local government shall have power to contract with any person or corporation, the owner of any lands or any franchise, easement, or interest therein over or under which the line of electric light wire power or pipeline is proposed to be laid or created for the right-of-way for the construction, maintenance, and operation of its electric light wires, pipes, poles, regulator stations, substations, or other property and for the erection, maintenance, occupation, and operation of offices at suitable distances for the public accommodation.

An electric utility, as defined in section 40-15-601 (6), exercising its rights under subsection (1) of this section may, in accordance with part 6 of article 15 of title 40, install or allow the installation of any attached facility for commercial broadband service, as those terms are defined in section 40-15-601 (1) and (3), respectively.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 386, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2453.

C.L.

§ 6354.

CSA:

C. 61, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-3.

L. 63:

P. 480, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-3.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 4, effective April 12.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-107), ch. 424, p. 3714, § 3, effective August 2.

38-5-104.
Right-of-way across private lands.

A telegraph, telephone, electric light, power, gas, or pipeline company, an electric transmission authority, or a city or town is entitled to the right-of-way over or under the land, property, privileges, rights-of-way, and easements of other persons and corporations and to the right to erect its poles, wires, pipes, regulator stations, substations, systems, and offices upon making just compensation therefor in the manner provided by law. When a right-of-way is taken under this section for an interstate electric transmission line, the court shall evaluate public purpose in light of the transmission system as a whole, including public use and benefits occurring either within Colorado or at a regional level. The rights granted by this section and section 38-5-105 to such electric light, power, gas, or pipeline companies or to such cities and towns shall not extend to the taking of any portion of the right-of-way of a railroad company, except to the extent of acquiring any necessary easement to cross the same or to serve such railroad company with electric light, power, or gas service. The rights granted by this section and section 38-5-105 to telegraph or telephone companies shall not extend to the taking of any portion of the right-of-way of a railroad company, except to the extent of acquiring any easement which does not materially interfere with the existing use by the railroad company, or except to the extent of acquiring any necessary easement to cross the same or to serve such railroad company with telegraph or telephone service.

If any right-of-way is taken by such telegraph, telephone, electric light power, gas, or pipeline company, city or town over any portion of the right-of-way of a railroad company the taking party shall pay the entire cost of constructing its facilities along such right-of-way, including any expenses incurred by the railroad for inspection and flagging as reasonably necessary to avoid interference with safe operation of the railroad. The taking party shall also bear the entire cost, including the cost of such inspection and flagging, of removing, relocating, altering, or protecting any facility installed on right-of-way so taken if, at any time, such removal, relocation, alteration, or protection becomes reasonably necessary to avoid interference with the railroad company’s ability to use its original right-of-way to operate its railroad efficiently and safely and to efficiently and safely serve existing, new, or potential railroad customers. The taking party shall indemnify the railroad company from all losses and expenses resulting from the negligence of the taking party, its successors or contractors, in connection with or related to such right-of-way. The taking party shall have no claim against the railroad for any loss resulting from damage to the taking party’s telegraph or telephone facilities resulting from any unforeseen emergencies or acts of God such as derailment, explosions, collisions, or activities reasonably performed in repairing damages caused by such occurrences.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 386, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2454.

C.L.

§ 6355.

CSA:

C. 61, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-4.

L. 63:

P. 480, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-4.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1382, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended,(SB 21-072), ch. 329, p. 2128, § 9, effective June 24.

Editor’s note:

Section 11 of chapter 329 (SB 21-072), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after June 24, 2021.

38-5-105.
Companies, cities, and towns have eminent domain right.

Such telegraph, telephone, electric light power, gas, or pipeline company or such city or town is vested with the power of eminent domain, and authorized to proceed to obtain rights-of-way for poles, wires, pipes, regulator stations, substations, and systems for such purposes by means thereof. Whenever such company or such city or town is unable to secure by deed, contract, or agreement such rights-of-way for such purposes over, under, across, and upon the lands, property, privileges, rights-of-way, or easements of persons or corporations, it shall be lawful for such telegraph, telephone, electric light power, gas, or pipeline company or any city or town owning electric power producing or distribution facilities to acquire such title in the manner now provided by law for the exercise of the right of eminent domain and in the manner as set forth in this article.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 386, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 2455.

C.L.

§ 6356.

CSA:

C. 61, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-5.

L. 63:

P. 480, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-5.

38-5-106.
Possession pending action.

At any time after jurisdiction has been obtained pursuant to section 38-1-103, the petitioner, upon notice to the respondent pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure, may move for an order for immediate possession. Upon such motion and after hearing, the court, by rule in that behalf made, may authorize the petitioner, upon payment into court or to the clerk thereof of the amount determined by the court as probably sufficient to pay the sum that may ultimately be awarded as compensation and damages for the taking, if not in possession to take possession of such right-of-way, and if already in possession to maintain and keep such possession, and in all cases to use and enjoy such right-of-way during the pendency and until the final conclusion of such proceedings, and the court may stay all actions and proceedings against such petitioner on account thereof. Withdrawal from the sum so deposited may be had as provided in section 38-1-105 (6)(b). At such hearing for immediate possession, the court shall hear and dispose of all objections that are raised at that time concerning the motion for immediate possession, the legal sufficiency of the petition, or the regularity of the proceedings in any other respect.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 386, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 2456.

C.L.

§ 6357.

CSA:

C. 61, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-6.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1406, § 2, effective July 18.

38-5-107.
Companies, cities, and towns carrying high voltage - crossings - arbitration.

Any person, corporation, or city or town seeking to secure a right-of-way for lines of electric light or for the transmission of electric power for any purpose over, under, or across any right-of-way of any other person, corporation, or city or town for such purposes or seeking to erect or construct its lines of wire under or over the lines of wire already constructed by such other person, corporation, or city or town for any such purposes upon, under, along, or across any public highway or upon, under, along, or across any public lands owned or controlled by the state of Colorado before constructing such lines or wires over, under, or across such rights-of-way or wires of other persons, corporations, or cities or towns, where either of said lines or wires carry a current at an electrical pressure of five thousand volts or more, shall agree with such other persons, corporations, or cities or towns as to the conditions under or upon which such overhead or underneath construction or crossing shall be made, looking to the due protection and safeguard of the wires of the person, corporation, or city or town already having a right-of-way for such wires and looking to the safety of life, health, and property. In case of an inability to agree upon the conditions under or upon which such overhead or underneath crossings shall be made, the person, corporation, or city or town owning and operating or controlling the lines of wires already built or constructed and the person, corporation, or city or town seeking to construct new lines or wires or to make said crossings shall each select a person as an arbitrator, which two persons shall determine said conditions under or upon which such overhead or underneath construction or crossing shall be made. In case of a disagreement in regard thereto by the arbitrators, they shall select a third person to act with them, and the decision made by any two of said arbitrators shall be final and binding upon the person, corporation, or city or town so seeking to make or construct the crossings, who shall construct the crossings in a manner determined by such arbitrators.

The parties interested, before they make their submission to the arbitrators, shall make and subscribe a written article of agreement in and by which they shall agree to submit the matter as to how said crossings shall be made to the arbitrators named, and will abide by their award. Said award shall be in writing, and a copy thereof delivered to each of the parties interested. Such conditions for protection at said crossings shall be established at the sole expense of the person, corporation, or city or town seeking the right-of-way for such overhead or underneath construction or crossings. Nothing in this article shall affect the right of any person, corporation, or city or town to make such crossings where the lines or wires of neither of the parties concerned carry a current at an electrical pressure of less than five thousand volts.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 387, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 2457.

C.L.

§ 6358.

CSA:

C. 61, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-7.

L. 63:

P. 481, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-7.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 303, § 5, effective April 12.

38-5-108.
Consent necessary to use of streets.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize any person, partnership, association, corporation, or city or town to erect any poles, construct any electric light power line, or pipeline, or extend any wires or lines along, through, in, upon, under, or over any streets or alleys of any city or incorporated town without first obtaining the consent of the municipal authorities having power to give the consent of such city or incorporated town.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 388, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 2458.

C.L.

§ 6359.

CSA:

C. 61, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 50-5-8.

L. 63:

P. 482, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-5-8.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 6, effective April 12.